Hawaii statutes.
§97-1 Definitions. When used in this
chapter:

(1) "Administrative action" means the
proposal, drafting, consideration, amendment, enactment, or defeat by any
administrative agency of any rule, regulation, or other action governed by
section 91-3.

(2) "Administrative agency" means a
commission, board, agency, or other body, or official in the state government
that is not a part of the legislative or judicial branch.

(3) "Contribution" includes a gift,
subscription, forgiveness of a loan, advance, or deposit of money, or anything
of value and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or not
enforceable, to make a contribution.

(4) "Expenditure" includes a payment,
distribution, forgiveness of a loan, advance, deposit, or gift of money, or
anything of value and includes a contract, promise, or agreement, whether or
not enforceable, to make an expenditure. "Expenditure" also includes
compensation or other consideration paid to a lobbyist for the performance of
lobbying services. "Expenditure" excludes the expenses of preparing
written testimony and exhibits for a hearing before the legislature or an
administrative agency.

(5) "Legislative action" means the
sponsorship, drafting, introduction, consideration, modification, enactment, or
defeat of any bill, resolution, amendment, report, nomination, appointment, or
any other matter pending or proposed in the legislature.

(6) "Lobbyist" means any individual who for
pay or other consideration engages in lobbying in excess of five hours in any
month of any reporting period described in section 97-3 or spends more than
$750 lobbying during any reporting period described in section 97-3.

(7) "Lobbying" means communicating directly
or through an agent, or soliciting others to communicate, with any official in
the legislative or executive branch, for the purpose of attempting to influence
legislative or administrative action or a ballot issue.

(8) "Person" means a corporation,
individual, union, association, firm, sole proprietorship, partnership, committee,
club, or any other organization or a representative of a group of persons
acting in concert. [L 1975, c 160, pt of §1; am L 1980, c 129, §1(a); am L
1982, c 105, §1; am L 1989, c 225, §1; am L 1995, c 220, §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next